Washington statutes.
RCW 11.130.259

Order for relocation.

Any order for the relocation of a minor under a guardianship must comply with the notice requirements of RCW 26.09.430 through 26.09.490.

[ 2020 c 312 s 122.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—2020 c 312: See note following RCW 11.130.915.